Indiana, session 2026, HB1345.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 15-17-5-6.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.229-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 6.5. (a) A person that labels meat products shall
not misbrand a cultivated meat product.
(b) A cultivated meat product is misbranded if the cultivated meat
product is:
(1) advertised;
(2) labeled; or
(3) offered for sale or sold;
in a manner that does not clearly indicate that it is a cultivated meat
product or not in accordance with rules adopted by the board.
(c) The board shall investigate complaints that a person:
(1) offered for sale; or
(2) sold;
a misbranded cultivated meat product.
(d) A person shall include the phrase "THIS IS AN IMITATION
MEAT PRODUCT" on the package containing a cultivated meat
2026 IN 1345—LS 6968/DI 150


product.
(e) The board may:
(1) take any enforcement action authorized under this chapter
for violations of this section; or
(2) impose a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000) on a person that violates this section. Civil
penalties collected under this section shall be deposited in the
state general fund.
(f) Each day a violation continues constitutes a separate offense.
(g) After notice and hearing in compliance with IC 4-21.5, the
board may seek a court order to enjoin a person from labeling
meat products if the person repeatedly and persistently fails to
comply with this section and the rules adopted under this section.
(e) (h) The board shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to carry out its
responsibilities under this section.
SECTION 2. IC 16-18-2-137, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2022,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 137. (a) "Food establishment", for purposes of
IC 16-20-5.7, IC 16-42-5, IC 16-42-5.2, and IC 16-42-5.3, and
IC 16-42-5.4, means any building, room, basement, vehicle of
transportation, cellar, or open or enclosed area occupied or used for
handling food.
(b) The term does not include the following:
(1) A dwelling where food is prepared on the premises by the
occupants, free of charge, for their consumption or for
consumption by their guests.
(2) A gathering of individuals at a venue of an organization that
is organized for educational purposes in a nonpublic educational
setting or for religious purposes, if:
(A) the individuals separately or jointly provide or prepare,
free of charge, and consume their own food or that of others
attending the gathering; and
(B) the gathering is for a purpose of the organization.
Gatherings for the purpose of the organization include funerals,
wedding receptions, christenings, bar or bat mitzvahs, baptisms,
communions, and other events or celebrations sponsored by the
organization.
(3) A vehicle used to transport food solely for distribution to the
needy, either free of charge or for a nominal donation.
(4) A private gathering of individuals who separately or jointly
provide or prepare and consume their own food or that of others
attending the gathering, regardless of whether the gathering is
2026 IN 1345—LS 6968/DI 150


held on public or private property.
(5) Except for food prepared by a for-profit entity, a venue of the
sale of food prepared for an organization:
(A) that is organized for:
(i) religious purposes; or
(ii) educational purposes in a nonpublic educational setting;
(B) that is exempt from taxation under Section 501 of the
Internal Revenue Code; and
(C) that offers the food for sale to the final consumer at an
event held for the benefit of the organization;
unless the food is being provided in a restaurant or a cafeteria
with an extensive menu of prepared foods.
(6) Except for food prepared by a for-profit entity, an Indiana
nonprofit organization that:
(A) is organized for civic, fraternal, veterans, or charitable
purposes;
(B) is exempt from taxation under Section 501 of the Internal
Revenue Code; and
(C) offers food for sale to the final consumer at an event held
for the benefit of the organization;
if the events conducted by the organization take place for not
more than fifteen (15) days in a calendar year.
(7) The holder of a farm winery permit under IC 7.1-3-12-5 or a
brewer's permit under IC 7.1-3-2-7(5) if the requirements of
IC 16-42-5-30 are met.
(8) A home based vendor or an individual vendor who sells a food
product under IC 16-42-5.3.
SECTION 3. IC 16-18-2-190.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 190.4. "Insect protein", for
purposes of IC 16-42-5.6, means a protein that is:
(1) naturally derived from the processing of:
(A) whole insects; or
(B) parts of insects; and
(2) intended for human consumption.
SECTION 4. IC 16-18-2-274, AS AMENDED BY P.L.110-2021,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 274. (a) "Person" means, except as provided in
subsections (b), (c), (d), and (e), and (f), an individual, a firm, a
partnership, an association, a fiduciary, an executor or administrator,
a governmental entity, or a corporation.
(b) "Person", for purposes of IC 16-25, has the meaning set forth in
2026 IN 1345—LS 6968/DI 150


IC 16-25-1.1-8.
(c) "Person", for purposes of IC 16-31, means an individual, a
partnership, a corporation, an association, a joint stock association, or
a governmental entity other than an agency or instrumentality of the
United States.
(d) "Person", for purposes of IC 16-42-5.6, has the meaning set
forth in IC 16-42-5.6-0.5.
(d) (e) "Person", for purposes of IC 16-42-10, has the meaning set
forth in IC 16-42-10-3.
(e) (f) "Person", for purposes of IC 16-46-16.5, has the meaning set
forth in IC 16-46-16.5-2.
SECTION 5. IC 16-20-5.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 5.7. Indiana Food Protection Panel
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "panel" refers to the Indiana
food protection panel established by section 2 of this chapter.
Sec. 2. (a) The Indiana food protection panel is established.
(b) The panel shall hear and decide appeals submitted by
individuals cited by a local health officer or local health board
under IC 16-20-1 in response to a food establishment inspection.
Sec. 3. (a) The panel shall consist of the following three (3)
members:
(1) The commissioner or the commissioner's designee.
(2) One (1) member appointed by the commissioner who is an
employee of the food protection division of the state
department.
(3) One (1) member appointed by the commissioner who is an
employee of the state department.
(b) A member of the panel serves until:
(1) the member leaves employment with the state department;
or
(2) the member is removed by the commissioner.
Sec. 4. (a) A recipient may appeal an enforcement action issued
by a local health officer or local health board under IC 16-20-1 or
410 IAC 7-26 in response to an alleged violation of:
(1) IC 16-42-5;
(2) IC 16-42-5.1 (before its repeal);
(3) IC 16-42-5.2;
(4) IC 16-42-5.3; or
(5) IC 16-42-28;
to the panel in a manner prescribed by the panel.
2026 IN 1345—LS 6968/DI 150


(b) In order to make an appeal under this chapter, the recipient
of the enforcement action must file the appeal with the panel not
later than seven (7) days after the issuance of the enforcement
action. Upon the proper filing of an appeal under this section by a
recipient, the panel may stay the enforcement action until final
disposition of the appeal.
(c) A local health department may disregard the stay of an
enforcement action adopted by the panel if an urgent situation
caused by a recipient appealing an enforcement action creates a
clear and immediate danger to the public's health, safety, or
property.
(d) The panel may allow a recipient of an enforcement action to
continue operating until an appeal is heard by the panel when the
preponderance of the evidence indicates that the appeal is likely to
succeed.
Sec. 5. The panel shall do the following:
(1) Determine whether to hear an appeal filed under this
chapter not later than three (3) days after the filing of the
appeal and issue a denial of an appeal at any time after the
filing of the appeal.
(2) Inform the appellant in writing that the appeal will not be
heard and is considered denied.
(3) Hear an appeal not later than seven (7) days after the
filing of the appeal.
(4) Develop procedures for the review, consideration, and
hearing of an appeal filed under this chapter. The procedures
must include the following:
(A) Standards for evaluating an appeal filed under this
chapter.
(B) A procedure for consolidating appeals if there are at
least two (2) appeals filed:
(i) from the same order; or
(ii) involving a common question of law and fact.
(C) Written notice to the appellant and to the local health
officer who issued the enforcement action of the following:
(i) The appeal.
(ii) The date, time, and location of any hearing
concerning the appeal.
(D) Procedures for the sharing of information between
parties and the local board of health concerning the
circumstances resulting in the enforcement action.
(E) The order of the proceedings.
2026 IN 1345—LS 6968/DI 150


(F) The maintenance of records concerning a request for
appeal and any documentation resulting from the
investigation and hearing of the appeal.
Sec. 6. (a) The following individuals must be present at the
hearing:
(1) The appellant, or a representative of the appellant.
(2) The local health officer who issued the order or citation
under the enforcement action or the local health officer's
designee.
(b) The failure of an individual described in subsection (a) to be
present is not a cause for postponement of the hearing unless the
local health officer or the appellant requests and is granted a
continuance. The granting of a continuance does not modify any
time requirements under this chapter.
(c) If an individual described in subsection (a) fails to attend the
hearing without notifying the panel, then the panel shall rule in
favor of the present individual.
Sec. 7. The panel may hear appeals virtually.
Sec. 8. The panel shall issue a written decision for any appeal
that receives a hearing under this chapter.
Sec. 9. The panel shall issue a decision not later than fourteen
(14) days after the date of the filing of the appeal.
Sec. 10. If an appeal is:
(1) denied by the panel; or
(2) ruled in favor of the local health officer;
the enforcement actions under IC 16-20-1-26 apply.
Sec. 11. (a) A recipient appealing the enforcement action shall
pay an appeal fee of one hundred dollars ($100) to the state
department. The state department shall use the fees collected under
this chapter to administer the panel.
(b) If the recipient wins the appeal, the panel shall reimburse
the recipient the appeal fee described in subsection (a).
SECTION 6. IC 16-42-1-36 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 36. (a) The state department shall create a business
model determination worksheet and distribute the worksheet to all
local health departments.
(b) The business model determination worksheet shall include
the following information:
(1) An overview of all the different entities that may receive
a food safety or a food borne illness violation under this
article.
2026 IN 1345—LS 6968/DI 150


(2) A checklist of information that aids the local health
department in determining whether a specific entity has
violated any relevant food or sanitary requirements.
(3) A space for a local health department to identify and cite
which food or sanitary violation occurred.
(c) In the case of an appeal under IC 16-20-5.7, the local health
department shall share the business model determination
worksheet with the Indiana food protection panel.
SECTION 7. IC 16-42-2-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. A food is considered
to be misbranded under any of the following conditions:
(1) If the food's labeling is false or misleading in any way.
(2) If the food's labeling or packaging fails to conform with the
rules adopted under IC 16-42-1-2.
(3) If the food is offered for sale under the name of another food.
(4) If the food is an imitation of another food, unless the food's
label bears, in type of uniform size and prominence, the word
"imitation" and, immediately following that term, the name of the
food imitated.
(5) If the food's container is so made, formed, or filled as to be
misleading.
(6) If the food is in package form, unless the food bears a label
containing the following:
(A) The name and place of business of the manufacturer,
packer, or distributor.
(B) An accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in
terms of weight, measure, or numerical count. However,
reasonable variations shall be permitted under this clause and
exemptions for small packages shall be established by rules
adopted by the state department.
(7) If any word, statement, or other information required under
IC 16-42-1 through IC 16-42-4 to appear on the label or labeling
is not prominently placed on the food with the conspicuousness
(as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices in
the labeling) and in such terms that make the information likely
to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under
customary conditions of purchase and use.
(8) If the food purports to be or is represented as a food for which
a definition and standard of identity has been prescribed by rules
under section 1 of this chapter, unless:
(A) the food conforms to that definition and standard; and
(B) the food's label bears the name of the food specified in the
2026 IN 1345—LS 6968/DI 150


definition and standard, and, insofar as may be required by
those rules, the common names of optional ingredients (other
than spices, flavoring, and coloring) present in the food.
This subdivision with respect to artificial coloring does not apply
to butter, cheese, or ice cream.
(9) If the food purports to be or is represented as:
(A) a food for which a standard of quality has been prescribed
by rules as provided by section 1 of this chapter and the food's
quality falls below that standard, unless the label bears, in the
manner and form as the rules specify, a statement that the food
falls below that standard; or
(B) a food for which a standard or standards of fill of container
have been prescribed by rule under section 1 of this chapter
and the food falls below the applicable standard of fill of
container unless the food's label bears, in such manner and
form as the rules specify, a statement that the food falls below
that standard.
(10) If the food is not subject to subdivision (8), unless the food's
label bears:
(A) the common or usual name of the food, if any; and
(B) if the food is fabricated from at least two (2) ingredients,
the common or usual name of each ingredient. However,
spices, flavorings, and colorings, other than those sold as such,
may be designated as spices, flavorings, and colorings without
naming each. In addition, to the extent that compliance with
this clause is impracticable or results in deception or unfair
competition, the state department shall establish exemptions
by rule.
This subdivision with respect to artificial coloring does not apply
to butter, cheese, or ice cream.
(11) If the food purports to be or is represented to be for special
dietary uses, unless the food's label bears information concerning
the food's vitamin, mineral, and other dietary properties that the
state department determines to be, and by rules prescribes as
necessary to fully inform purchasers as to the food's value for
such uses.
(12) If the food bears or contains any artificial flavoring, artificial
coloring, or chemical preservative, unless the food bears labeling
stating that fact. However, to the extent that compliance with the
requirements of this subdivision is impracticable, the state
department shall establish exemptions by rule. This subdivision:
(A) with respect to artificial coloring, does not apply to butter,
2026 IN 1345—LS 6968/DI 150


cheese, or ice cream; and
(B) with respect to chemical preservatives, does not apply to
a pesticide chemical when used in or on a raw agricultural
commodity that is the product of the soil.
(13) If the food's labeling or packaging fails to conform with
the requirements set forth in IC 16-42-5.6.
SECTION 8. IC 16-42-5-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The state
department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 for the efficient
enforcement of this chapter and to establish minimum sanitary
standards for the operation of all food establishments.
(b) A corporation or local health department may not impose
any requirements or standards that exceed the minimum sanitary
standards adopted by the state department.
(c) To ensure that enforcement of state laws and rules is
uniform throughout Indiana, the state department shall provide to
the local health officers who are food environmental health
specialists guidelines concerning the interpretation of the state
department's rules.
SECTION 9. IC 16-42-5-33 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 33. The state department shall:
(1) designate an employee as the point of contact for local
health departments to whom they may submit questions
concerning the operation and enforcement of this chapter;
and
(2) distribute the employee's contact information to each local
health department.
SECTION 10. IC 16-42-5.3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.151-2024,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "end consumer"
means a person who is the last person to purchase any food product or
meat product and who does not resell the food product or meat
product.
(b) As used in this chapter, "meat product" has the meaning set
forth in IC 15-17-2-54.
(b) (c) As used in this chapter, "roadside stand" means a structure,
including a tent, stand, vehicle, or trailer that is:
(1) visible from a road; and
(2) located not more than one hundred (100) feet from the edge of
the side of the road;
where whole uncut produce, food products that are not time
2026 IN 1345—LS 6968/DI 150


temperature control for safety food, poultry that is exempt under
IC 15-17-5-11, rabbits, or eggs permitted for sale by the state egg board
are sold to an end consumer.
SECTION 11. IC 16-42-5.3-10, AS ADDED BY P.L.49-2022,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) This section applies to the sale of:
(1) poultry;
(2) meat products; and
(3) rabbits;
by an individual vendor of a farmers' market or roadside stand.
(b) The following products are exempt from the requirements of this
title that apply to food establishments:
(1) Poultry products produced under IC 15-17-5-11. Poultry
products sold at a farmers' market or roadside stand must be
frozen at the point of sale. Poultry products sold on the farm
where the product is produced must be kept refrigerated at the
point of sale and through delivery by the producer to the end
consumer.
(2) Rabbits that are slaughtered and processed on a farm for the
purpose of conducting limited sales on the farm, at a farmers'
market, and at a roadside stand. Rabbit meat sold at a farmers'
market or roadside stand must be frozen at the point of sale.
Rabbit meat sold on the farm where the product is produced must
be kept refrigerated at the point of sale and through delivery by
the producer to the end consumer. An individual who sells rabbits
under this subsection shall comply with the label requirements set
forth in this chapter.
(3) Meat products from livestock:
(A) raised on a farm; and
(B) slaughtered and processed at an official establishment
in compliance with IC 15-17-5;
for the purpose of conducting limited sales on the farm, at a
farmers' market, and at a roadside stand. Meat products from
livestock sold at a farmers' market or roadside stand or on the
farm must be frozen at the point of sale and through delivery
by the producer to the end consumer. An individual who sells
meat products from livestock under this subsection shall
comply with the label requirements set forth in this chapter.
(c) This section does not apply to the distribution of meat from a
game animal.
SECTION 12. IC 16-42-5.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 1345—LS 6968/DI 150


JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 5.4. Limited Custom Exempt Meat Product Sales
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "custom exempt meat product"
refers to a meat product derived from livestock that meets the
exemptions established under 9 CFR 303.1.
Sec. 2. (a) The production and sale of a custom exempt meat
product in accordance with this chapter are exempt from the
requirements of this title that apply to food establishments.
(b) An individual selling custom exempt meat products under
this chapter is not a home based vendor (as described in
IC 16-42-5.3-2).
Sec. 3. An individual may sell and deliver custom exempt meat
products under this chapter if the following criteria are met:
(1) The livestock is raised on the individual's farm.
(2) The end consumer takes ownership of the livestock before
the livestock is slaughtered.
(3) The livestock is slaughtered and processed and the meat is
labeled in compliance with IC 15-17-5.
(4) After picking up the processed and labeled custom exempt
meat product, the individual who raised the livestock delivers
the processed and labeled meat product to the end consumer
that purchased the meat product before the livestock was
slaughtered.
(5) The individual delivering the meat product to the end
consumer does not further alter the custom exempt meat
product packaged by a processor.
Sec. 4. Custom exempt meat products from livestock sold under
this chapter must be kept refrigerated through delivery by the
individual delivering the meat products under this chapter to the
end consumer.
Sec. 5. (a) An individual selling meat products under this
chapter is subject to a meat sampling and inspection if:
(1) the state department determines that the individual's meat
product is:
(A) misbranded under IC 16-42-2-3; or
(B) adulterated; or
(2) a consumer complaint has been received by the state
department.
(b) If the state department has reason to believe that an
imminent health hazard exists with respect to an individual's meat
product, the state department may order cessation of production
and sale of the meat product until the state department determines
2026 IN 1345—LS 6968/DI 150


that the health hazard has been addressed.
(c) For purposes of this chapter, the state health commissioner
or the commissioner's authorized representatives may take
samples for analysis and conduct examinations and investigations
through any officers or employees under the state health
commissioner's supervision. Those officers and employees may
enter, at reasonable times, the facilities of an individual selling
meat products under this chapter and inspect any meat products
in those places and all pertinent equipment, materials, containers,
and labeling.
(d) The Indiana state board of animal health shall assist the
state department and local health officers in carrying out this
section.
Sec. 6. Notwithstanding any other law, a local unit of
government (as defined in IC 14-22-31.5-1) may not by ordinance
or resolution require any licensure, certification, or inspection of
a meat product of an individual who sells meat products under this
chapter.
Sec. 7. (a) For the purpose of enforcing this chapter, the local
health officers are food environmental health specialists
subordinate to the state department.
(b) To ensure that enforcement of state laws and rules is
uniform throughout Indiana, the state department shall provide to
the local health officers who are food environmental health
specialists guidelines concerning the interpretation of the state
department's rules.
(c) A food environmental health specialist may not enforce the
state department's rules concerning an individual under this
chapter in a manner that is more strict than the state department's
guidelines.
SECTION 13. IC 16-42-5.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 5.6. Prohibition on Misbranded Alternative Meat
Products
Sec. 0.5. "Person" means any:
(1) individual;
(2) trustee;
(3) receiver;
(4) corporation;
(5) limited liability company;
(6) partnership;
2026 IN 1345—LS 6968/DI 150


(7) official establishment (as defined in IC 15-17-2-72); and
(8) other:
(A) firm;
(B) organization;
(C) association;
(D) cooperative; or
(E) group of individuals or persons.
Sec. 1. A person that labels a food product containing insect
protein shall not misbrand a food product containing insect
protein.
Sec. 2. A food product containing insect protein is misbranded
if the food product is knowingly and intentionally:
(1) advertised;
(2) labeled; or
(3) offered for sale or sold;
in a manner that does not clearly indicate that the food product
contains insect protein.
Sec. 3. A person shall include the phrase "THIS PRODUCT
CONTAINS INSECT PROTEIN" on the package of a food product
containing insect protein.
Sec. 4. A local health department shall investigate complaints
that a person:
(1) offered for sale; or
(2) sold;
a misbranded food product containing insect protein.
Sec. 5. (a) If the local health department has reasonable cause
to believe that a person is violating section 1 of this chapter, the
local health department may halt the sale of a food product
containing insect protein.
(b) Upon receiving an order to halt the sale of a food product
containing insect protein, a person may not:
(1) sell; or
(2) offer to sell;
the product in question until the local health department
determines whether the product in question is a misbranded food
product containing insect protein.
(c) The local health department may require a person to refrain
from:
(1) selling; or
(2) offering to sell;
the product in question until the local health department's
investigation is complete.
2026 IN 1345—LS 6968/DI 150


(d) If the local health department determines that a person:
(1) offered for sale; or
(2) sold;
a food product containing insect protein as a food product, the
local health department may require the person to dispose of the
misbranded food products containing insect protein in a manner
other than by sale to purchasers in Indiana.
Sec. 6. The local health department may impose a civil penalty
of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) on a person that
knowingly or intentionally violates this chapter. Civil penalties
collected under this section shall be deposited in a county's general
fund. Each day of violation after the receipt of a notice of a
violation of this chapter constitutes a separate violation.
Sec. 7. After notice and hearing in compliance with IC 4-21.5, a
local health department may seek a court order to enjoin a person
from selling misbranded food products containing insect protein if
the person repeatedly and persistently fails to comply with this
chapter and the requirements set forth in this chapter.
SECTION 14. IC 36-7-2.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 2.6. Personal Produce
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "produce" means covered
produce (as defined by 21 CFR 112) that is grown for one's own
consumption and enjoyment.
Sec. 2. A unit may not adopt or enforce an ordinance or
regulation that prohibits or has the effect of prohibiting a person
from cultivating produce on:
(1) the person's property; or
(2) the property of another person with the permission of the
property owner.
Sec. 3. Section 2 of this chapter does not prohibit a unit from
adopting ordinances and regulations imposing general standards
and requirements on a property where a person produces produce
if the standards and requirements are the same as those imposed
on other property within the zoning district.
Sec. 4. This chapter does not impair the terms of any contract,
including the governing documents (as defined in IC 32-25.5-2-3)
of a homeowners association.
2026 IN 1345—LS 6968/DI 150